cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Box a bojové sporty > Tréninkové vybavení na box a bojové sporty: Lapy na box a MMA; Tréninkové tyče; Bojové figuríny; Tréninkové podložky na bojová umění; Boxovací pytle – příslušenství; Boxovací pytle; Úderové bloky; Thajské lapy; Tréninkové zbraně
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 拳擊與武術 > 拳擊與武術訓練裝備: 拳擊/綜合格鬥用手套; 拳擊訓練棒; 柔術假人; 武術訓練墊; 拳擊沙包配件; 拳擊沙袋; 手靶; 泰拳靶; 訓練武器
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Boxe et arts martiaux > Équipement d'entraînement à la boxe et aux arts martiaux: Mitaines d'entraîneur de boxe et combat libre; Bâtons d'entraînement; Mannequins pour la lutte; Tapis d'entraînement d'arts martiaux; Accessoires pour punching-balls; Punching-balls; Boucliers de frappe; Paos thaï; Armes d'entraînement
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 권투/무술 > 권투/무술 훈련 장비: 권투/MMA 펀치 미트; 코칭 스틱; 격투 연습용 인체 모형; 무술 훈련 매트; 샌드백 부대용품; 샌드백; 스트라이크 실드; 타이 패드; 훈련용 무기
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Box și arte marțiale > Echipament de antrenament pentru box și arte marțiale: Mănuși pentru lovituri box și MMA; Jaloane tip tijă pentru antrenament; Manechine antrenament; Saltele de antrenament pentru arte marțiale; Accesorii saci pentru lovituri și antrenament; Saci de box și antrenament; Protecții pentru lovituri; Pernuțe thailandeze; Arme de antrenament
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Boks i sztuki walki > Trening bokserski i sztuk walki: Tarcze trenera do boksu i MMA; Kije trenerskie; Kukły do walki na chwyty; Maty treningowe do sztuk walki; Akcesoria do worków treningowych; Worki treningowe; Tarcze treningowe; Tarcze tajskie; Broń treningowa
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Boks in borilne veščine > Oprema za vadbo boksa in borilnih veščin: Fokuserji za boks in mešane borilne veščine; Palice za treniranje; Vadbene lutke za grappling; Talne podloge za vadbo borilnih veščin; Dodatki za boksarske vreče in vreče za vadbo; Torbe za boksarske vreče in vreče za vadbo; Ščitniki za udarce; Zaščita za muay thai; Orožje za vadbo
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 拳击/武术 > 拳击/武术训练设备: 拳击/MMA 手靶; 教练训练棍; 格斗假人; 武术训练垫; 沙袋/训练袋配件; 拳击/训练沙袋; 搏击盾; 泰拳靶; 训练用武器
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Box a bojové umenia > Tréningové vybavenie na box a bojové umenia: Boxovacie rukavice na box a MMA; Trénerské palice; Tréningové figuríny; Tréningové podložky na bojové umenia; Príslušenstvo k boxovacím a tréningovým vakom; Boxovacie a tréningové vrecia; Tréningové bloky; Thajské podložky; Tréningové zbrane
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Boxning och kampsporter > Träningsutrustning för boxning och kampsporter: Mittsar för boxning och kampsporter; Fokuspinnar; Träningsdockor; Träningsmattor för kampsport; Tillbehör till sandsäckar och träningssäckar; Sandsäckar och träningssäckar; Slagkuddar; Thaipads; Träningsvapen
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Boksing og kampsport > Treningsutstyr for boksing og kampsport: Slagputer for boksing og MMA; Trenerstokker; Grapplingmodeller; Treningsmatter for kampsport; Tilbehør til punching- og treningsbager; Punching- og treningsbager; Treningsskjold; Thaipads; Treningsvåpen
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Đấm bốc & Võ thuật > Thiết bị tập luyện đấm bốc & võ thuật: Găng tay hở ngón đấm bốc và MMA; Gậy huấn luyện; Hình nộm khóa siết; Thảm tập võ; Phụ kiện bao cát tập luyện; Bao cát đấm bốc; Khiên; Đích đá Thái; Vũ khí tập luyện
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Boks ve Dövüş Sporları > Boks ve Dövüş Sporları Eğitim Ekipmanları: Boks ve MMA Lapaları; Antrenör çubukları; Dövüş Mankenleri; Dövüş sanatları antrenman matları; Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Torba Aksesuarları; Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Torbaları; Darbe Yastıkları; Thai darbe yastıkları; Antrenman silahları
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Boks i borilačke vještine > Oprema za trening boksa i borilačkih vještina: Fokuseri za boks i MMA; Trenerske palice; Lutke za trening; Prostirke za vježbanje borilačkih vještina; Dodaci za boksačke i vreće za vježbanje; Vreće za boksanje i vježbanje; Štitnici za udarce; Štitnici za tajlandski boks; Oružje za vježbanje
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Бокс и бойни изкуства > Оборудване за тренировки по бокс и бойни изкуства: Ръкавици тип „лапи“ за бокс и смесени бойни изкуства (MMA); Треньорски стикове; Тренировъчни манекени за бокс; Постелки за тренировки по бойни изкуства; Аксесоари за боксови чували и круши; Боксови чували и круши; Щитове за удари; Тайландски подложки; Тренировъчни оръжия
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Boxe e artes marciais > Equipamento de treinamento para boxe e artes marciais: Luvas de boxe e MMA; Bastões de treinamento; Bonecos de luta corpo a corpo; Tatames de treinamento para artes marciais; Acessórios para treinos e sacos de boxe; Sacos de boxe; Aparadores de chute; Aparadores thai; Armas de treinamento
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > มวยและศิลปะการต่อสู้ > อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมสำหรับมวยและศิลปะการต่อสู้: เป้าล่อสำหรับการชกมวยและ MMA; ไม้ฝึกสอน; หุ่นซ้อม; เบาะซ้อมศิลปะการต่อสู้; อุปกรณ์กระสอบทราย; กระสอบทราย; เป้าซ้อม; เป้าเตะมวยไทย; อาวุธสำหรับฝึกซ้อม
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ボクシング・格闘技 > ボクシング・格闘技用練習器具: ボクシング・総合格闘技用パンチングミット; コーチングスティック; 練習用ダミー人形; 格闘技用トレーニングマット; サンドバッグ関連用品; サンドバッグ; ボクシング・格闘技用ミット; キックミット; トレーニング用武器
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Бокс и единоборства > Тренировочный инвентарь для бокса и единоборств: Лапы для бокса и смешанных единоборств; Тренерские палки; Манекены для отработки захватов; Тренировочные маты для единоборств; Аксессуары для груш и мешков; Груши и мешки; Макивары; Тай-пэды; Тренировочное оружие
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Nyrkkeily ja vapaaottelu > Nyrkkeilyn ja vapaaottelun harjoitteluvälineet: Nyrkkeilyn ja vapaaottelun pistehanskat; Valmennuskepit; Paininuket; Kamppailulajien harjoitusmatot; Nyrkkeily- ja harjoittelusäkkien lisätarvikkeet; Nyrkkeily- ja harjoitussäkit; Potkutyynyt; Thaityynyt; Harjoitusaseet
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Boxen & Kampfsport > Trainingsausrüstung für Boxen & Kampfsport: Boxpratzen; Trainerstäbe; Training-Dummys; Kampfsport-Trainingsmatten; Box- & Trainingssackzubehör; Box- & Trainingssäcke; Schlagpolster; Thai-Pads; Trainingswaffen
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Boxing & Martial Arts > Boxing & Martial Arts Training Equipment: Boxing & MMA Punch Mitts; Coaching Sticks; Grappling Dummies; Martial Arts Training Mats; Punching & Training Bag Accessories; Punching & Training Bags; Strike Shields; Thai Pads; Training Weapons
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Boksz és harcművészetek > Boksz- és harcművészeti edzőfelszerelések: Boksz- és MMA-ütőkesztyűk; Edzőbotok; Birkózó próbabábuk; Harcművészeti edzőszőnyegek; Boksz- és edzőzsák-kiegészítők; Boksz- és edzőzsákok; Ütőpajzsok; Thai pajzsok; Gyakorlófegyverek
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Boxe e arti marziali > Attrezzature per l'allenamento per boxe e arti marziali: Guanti da passata per boxe e arti marziali; Bastoni da allenamento; Manichini da allenamento; Tappeti da allenamento per arti marziali; Accessori per sacchi e colpitori; Sacchi da pugilato; Paracolpi; Pao thailandesi; Armi da allenamento
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Boxe e artes marciais > Equipamento de treino para boxe e artes marciais: Mitenes para boxe e MMA; Bastões de treino; Bonecos de luta corpo a corpo; Tapetes de treino de artes marciais; Acessórios para sacos de treino e de boxe; Sacos de treino e de boxe; Plastrons; Almofadas de treino tailandesas; Armas de treino
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Πυγμαχία & πολεμικές τέχνες > Εξοπλισμός προπόνησης πυγμαχίας & πολεμικών τεχνών: Γάντια χτυπήματος χωρίς χωρίσματα πυγμαχίας & MMA; Ράβδοι προπονητή; Ομοιώματα πάλης (Grappling); Στρώματα πολεμικών τεχνών; Αξεσουάρ σάκων προπόνησης & χτυπήματος; Σάκοι προπόνησης & χτυπήματος; Ασπίδες χτυπήματος; Στόχοι Thai; Όπλα προπόνησης
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Boksen en vechtsporten > Benodigdheden voor boks- en vechtsporttraining: Handstootkussens voor boksen en MMA; Coachingsticks; Worstelpoppen; Trainingsmatten voor vechtsporten; Accessoires voor boksballen en oefenzakken; Stootzakken; Trap- en stootkussens; Thai pads; Trainingswapens
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Boksas ir kovos menai > Bokso ir kovos menų treniruočių įranga: Bokso ir MMA letenos; Trenerių lazdos; Imtynių manekenai; Kovos menų treniruočių kilimėliai; Bokso maišų ir kriaušių priedai; Bokso maišai ir kriaušės; Makivaros spyriams; Tailando bokso letenos; Treniruočių ginklai
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Boksning og kampsport > Træningsudstyr til boksning og kampsport: Handsker til boksning og MMA; Træningsstave; Dummies til brydning; Træningsmåtter til kampsport; Bokse- og træningspuder – tilbehør; Bokse- og træningspuder; Sparkepuder; Thaipuder; Træningsvåben
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Boxeo y artes marciales > Equipamiento de entrenamiento para boxeo y artes marciales: Mitones para boxeo y artes marciales mixtas; Bastones de entrenamiento; Muñecos para entrenamiento de lucha; Colchonetas de entrenamiento para artes marciales; Accesorios para punchings y sacos de entrenamiento; Punchings y sacos de entrenamiento; Escudos de trabajo; Paos tailandeses; Armas de entrenamiento